Utah statutes.
3-1-12.2.   Waiver of notice.
(1)  A written waiver of notice signed at any time by the member waives the
notice requirement under this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the
bylaws.
(2)  A member's attendance at a meeting waives an objection to lack of notice
unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the
meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice.
